Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,207
Act, how construed.

The Nebraska Amusement Ride Act shall not be construed to alter the duty of care or the liability of an owner of an amusement ride for injuries or death of any person or damage to any property arising out of an accident involving an amusement ride. The state and its officers and employees shall not be construed to assume liability arising out of an accident involving an amusement ride by reason of administration of the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1818;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 43.
July 1, 2019